Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1633.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 35 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER B.1SHARED ELECTRIC LOW-SPEED SCOOTERSSec.3531. Definitions.3532. Oversight.3533. Shared electric low-speed scooter program.3534. Insurance.3535. Safety issues.3536. Labor peace agreements.3537. Enforcement.3538. Police powers.123456789101112131415161718 3539. Reports.3540. Applicability and construction.§ 3531. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abandoned shared electric low-speed scooter." A shared electric low-speed scooter that meets all of the following:(1) The user of the shared electric low-speed scooter is not visible to an individual making an initial report on a hotline that the shared electric low-speed scooter is abandoned.(2) The shared electric low-speed scooter is illegally parked on a highway or is on property on which the shared electric low-speed scooter is prohibited to be used or kept as provided under this subchapter or an applicable municipal ordinance or executive order."Authorized municipality." Any of the following:(1) A city of the second class.(2) A city of the second class A.(3) A city of the third class."Commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise." A person that makes electric low-speed scooters available for rent to the public for use as determined by an authorized municipality."Electric low-speed scooter." As follows:(1) A device weighing less than 100 pounds that:(i) Has two or three wheels.(ii) Has handlebars and an electric motor.(iii) Has a floorboard which can be stood upon while 20250HB1633PN1983 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 riding or a seat which can be sat upon while riding.(iv) Is solely powered by an electric motor or human power, or both.(v) Has a maximum top speed of 20 miles per hour.(2) The term includes a shared mobility system with an electric low-speed scooter if the shared mobility system meets the requirements under paragraph (1).(3) The term does not include:(i) A pedalcycle with electric assist.(ii) An electric personal assistive mobility device.(iii) A motorcycle.(iv) A motorized pedalcycle.(v) A motor-driven cycle."Hotline." A complaint hotline established under section 3533(b)(2) (relating to shared electric low-speed scooter program)."Program." A shared electric low-speed scooter program authorized under section 3533(a).§ 3532. Oversight.The department shall be the primary Commonwealth agency responsible for the oversight of:(1) Shared electric low-speed scooters operating in this Commonwealth.(2) Programs established by authorized municipalities.(3) The adoption of required ordinances, any amendment to the required ordinances and any subsequent policy developed by authorized municipalities, to ensure compliance with this subchapter.§ 3533. Shared electric low-speed scooter program.(a) Authorization.--An authorized municipality may establish 20250HB1633PN1983 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a shared electric low-speed scooter program with a commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise within the boundaries of the authorized municipality in accordance with this subchapter.(b) Ordinance.--To establish a program, an authorized municipality must first adopt an ordinance, which must include:(1) The following policies:(i) An individual operating a shared electric low-speed scooter authorized under a program shall be granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable to the operator of a pedalcycle under Subchapter A (relating to operation of pedalcycles).(ii) A shared electric low-speed scooter may operate on a highway, a pedalcycle lane on a highway or a pedalcycle path owned by the Commonwealth or authorized municipality and within the boundaries of an authorized municipality.(iii) Subject to subparagraph (iv)(C), an individual may not operate a shared electric low-speed scooter on a sidewalk unless the shared electric low-speed scooter is upright and appropriately docked in a designated parking area as determined by the authorized municipality.(iv) An individual may not operate a shared electric low-speed scooter on any of the following:(A) A freeway.(B) A highway with a posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour or greater.(C) A sidewalk in a business district.(v) An individual who is under 16 years of age may not operate a shared electric low-speed scooter.20250HB1633PN1983 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vi) An individual may not operate a shared electric low-speed scooter at a speed greater than 15 miles per hour.(vii) When operated between sunset and sunrise, a shared electric low-speed scooter shall be equipped with:(A) A lamp on the front which emits a beam of white light intended to illuminate the shared electric low-speed scooter's path and is visible from a distance of at least 500 feet in front.(B) A red lamp facing to the rear which is visible at least 500 feet to the rear.(C) A reflector on each side.(viii) A commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise shall provide information on customer support service for approval by the authorized municipality.(2) The establishment of a complaint hotline in accordance with the following:(i) The hotline shall be used to report:(A) Abandoned shared electric low-speed scooters.(B) Violations of this subchapter or the ordinance.(ii) The hotline telephone number shall be displayed on each shared electric low-speed scooter.(iii) The hotline may be through an existing municipal response center operated by the authorized municipality.(3) The establishment of requirements addressing:(i) Geofencing.20250HB1633PN1983 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Rider limits.(iii) Fleet size.(iv) Vehicle maintenance information.(v) Strategies to reduce negative interactions between shared electric low-speed scooter riders and pedestrians.(vi) Parking and charging station installation and maintenance.(vii) Data management and reporting.(viii) Education, public awareness and public participation plans.(ix) Fare structure.(c) Amendments and policy changes.--An authorized municipality may amend the ordinance adopted under subsection (b) or adopt a subsequent policy change consistent with this subchapter to improve the operations of the program or further protect public safety.(d) Notice.--Each authorized municipality adopting an ordinance in accordance with subsection (b) or an amendment or policy change in accordance with subsection (c) shall notify the department of the adoption of the ordinance, amendment or policy change.§ 3534. Insurance.(a) Requirement.--A commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise operating in an authorized municipality shall provide to the authorized municipality proof of insurance coverage as required under this section.(b) Coverage amounts.--A commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise shall maintain insurance coverage at the following levels:20250HB1633PN1983 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Commercial general liability insurance coverage with a limit of at least $2,000,000 for each occurrence and at least $2,000,000 in the aggregate.(2) Automobile insurance coverage with a limit of at least $1,000,000 for each occurrence and at least $1,000,000 in the aggregate.(3) If the commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise employs an individual, workers' compensation coverage of not less than required by Federal or State law.§ 3535. Safety issues.If a program includes the use of a highway owned or under the jurisdiction of the department, the department may restrict access, permanently or temporarily, to a segment of the highway under the program if the department identifies a pattern of safety issues that cannot be reasonably corrected. The department shall establish a process to:(1) Examine the safety issue, limited to the evaluation of accidents and damage to property on the highway.(2) Communicate the safety issue and consult with an authorized municipality and commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise prior to restricting access.§ 3536. Labor peace agreements.(a) Agreement required.-- To ensure uninterrupted service and minimize labor disputes, all operators and service providers of electric low-speed scooters shall present a fully executed labor peace agreement with any labor organization representing their employees as part of their license application or within 90 days of being informed of the representation if their employees were not previously represented by the labor organization.(b) Availability.--Labor peace agreements must be made 20250HB1633PN1983 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 available upon request.(c) Labor disputes.--In the event of a labor dispute, operators and service providers of electric low-speed scooters shall take all reasonable steps to maintain service levels and minimize the impact on the public.§ 3537. Enforcement.In addition to any fines or penalties relating to a pedalcycle under Subchapter A (relating to operation of pedalcycles), an authorized municipality may impose one or more of the following:(1) A fine for the failure to operate a shared electric low-speed scooter consistent with this subchapter, not to exceed $50.(2) A fine for the failure to park a shared electric low-speed scooter consistent with this subchapter, not to exceed $150.(3) A fine on a commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise for each abandoned shared electric low-speed scooter that is not collected and returned to a corral or storage within three hours of the abandonment of the shared electric low-speed scooter, not to exceed $150 per day.(4) A civil penalty on a commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise that does not provide the insurance required under section 3534 (relating to insurance), not to exceed $1,000 for each day that the commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise is operated without the required insurance. The civil penalty collected under this paragraph by the authorized municipality shall be used for the safety, operation and management of 20250HB1633PN1983 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shared electric low-speed scooters or pedalcycles.§ 3538. Police powers.(a) Presumption.--For the purposes of this subchapter, it shall be presumed to be a reasonable exercise of police power to regulate and enforce the use of shared electric low-speed scooters consistent with this subchapter and the regulation of pedalcycles, as applicable.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prevent the department on a State-designated highway or a local authority on a local-designated highway from the reasonable exercise of the police powers of the department or local authority in accordance with section 6109 (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities).§ 3539. Reports.(a) Requirement.--Each authorized municipality that has established a program, in coordination with the department, shall prepare an annual report on the deployment of electric low-speed scooters under the program.(b) Contents.--Each report under this section shall include the following:(1) The number of rides.(2) The number of accidents.(3) The frequency of use.(4) Any ordinance, regulation or policy adopted in accordance with this subchapter.(c) Submittal.--Each report under this section shall be submitted to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the 20250HB1633PN1983 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Posting.--Each report under this section shall be posted on the publicly accessible Internet websites of the department and the authorized municipality.§ 3540. Applicability and construction.(a) Title and registration.--Notwithstanding Subchapter A of Chapter 11 (relating to certificate of title) or Subchapter A of Chapter 13 (relating to general provisions), a shared electric low-speed scooter authorized under this subchapter shall not be required to comply with certificate of title or vehicle registration requirements under this title.(b) Motor vehicles.--An electric low-speed scooter authorized under this subchapter shall not be construed as a motor vehicle.(c) Private ownership.--Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit a person that is not a commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise from owning or operating an electric low-speed scooter. The person shall not be subject to the requirements under this subchapter that apply specifically to a commercial electric low-speed-scooter-sharing enterprise.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For an authorized municipality that is a city of the second class, the provisions of 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 Subch. B.1 shall apply on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For an authorized municipality that is a city of the second class A or a city of the third class, the provisions of 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 35 Subch. B.1 shall apply on or after the date that is 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1633PN1983 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930